Mississippi, session 2026, HB523.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  When a forensic interview is required as part of an investigation into any report that a child is or has been neglected, abused, a victim of commercial sexual exploitation or a victim of human trafficking, the person conducting the interview shall prohibit any person, including a parent or guardian, who is accused of the neglect, abuse, commercial sexual exploitation or human trafficking from being present in the room or in the same location in which the forensic interview is being conducted. (2)  No person, including a parent or guardian, who is accused of the neglect, abuse, commercial sexual exploitation or human trafficking of a child, has a right to be present in the room or in the same location during the time in which any forensic interview is being conducted in response to a report of child abuse. SECTION 2.  Section 43-21-261, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-21-261.  (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, records involving children shall not be disclosed, other than to necessary staff or officials of the youth court, a guardian ad litem appointed to a child by the court, or a Court-Appointed Special Advocate (CASA) volunteer who may be assigned in a dependency, abuse or neglect case, except pursuant to an order of the youth court specifying the person or persons to whom the records may be disclosed, the extent of the records which may be disclosed and the purpose of the disclosure.  Such court orders for disclosure shall be limited to those instances in which the youth court concludes, in its discretion, that disclosure is required for the best interests of the child, the public safety, the functioning of the youth court, or to identify a person who knowingly made a false allegation of child abuse or neglect, and then only to the following persons: (a)  The judge of another youth court or member of another youth court staff; (b)  The court of the parties in a child custody or adoption cause in another court; (c)  A judge of any other court or members of another court staff, including the chancery court that ordered a forensic interview; (d)  Representatives of a public or private agency providing supervision or having custody of the child under order of the youth court; (e)  Any person engaged in a bona fide research purpose, provided that no information identifying the subject of the records shall be made available to the researcher unless it is absolutely essential to the research purpose and the judge gives prior written approval, and the child, through his or her representative, gives permission to release the information; (f)  The Mississippi Department of Employment Security, or its duly authorized representatives, for the purpose of a child's enrollment into the Job Corps Training Program as authorized by Title IV of the Comprehensive Employment Training Act of 1973 (29 USCS Section 923 et seq.).  However, no records, reports, investigations or information derived therefrom pertaining to child abuse or neglect shall be disclosed; (g)  Any person pursuant to a finding by a judge of the youth court of compelling circumstances affecting the health, safety or well-being of a child and that such disclosure is in the best interests of the child or an adult who was formerly the subject of a youth court delinquency proceeding; (h)  A person who was the subject of a knowingly made false allegation of child abuse or neglect which has resulted in a conviction of a perpetrator in accordance with Section 97-35-47 or which allegation was referred by the Department of Child Protection Services to a prosecutor or law enforcement official in accordance with the provisions of Section 43-21-353(4). Law enforcement agencies may disclose information to the public concerning the taking of a child into custody for the commission of a delinquent act without the necessity of an order from the youth court.  The information released shall not identify the child or his address unless the information involves a child convicted as an adult. (2)  Any records involving children which are disclosed under an order of the youth court or pursuant to the terms of this section and the contents thereof shall be kept confidential by the person or agency to whom the record is disclosed unless otherwise provided in the order.  Any further disclosure of any records involving children shall be made only under an order of the youth court as provided in this section. (3)  Upon request, the parent, guardian or custodian of the child who is the subject of a youth court cause or any attorney for such parent, guardian or custodian, shall have the right to inspect any record, report or investigation relevant to a matter to be heard by a youth court, except that the identity of the reporter shall not be released, nor the name of any other person where the person or agency making the information available finds that disclosure of the information would be likely to endanger the life or safety of such person.  The attorney for the parent, guardian or custodian of the child, upon request, shall be provided a copy of any record, report or investigation relevant to a matter to be heard by a youth court, but the identity of the reporter must be redacted and the name of any other person must also be redacted if the person or agency making the information available finds that disclosure of the information would be likely to endanger the life, safety or well-being of the person.  A record provided to the attorney under this section must remain in the attorney's control and the attorney may not provide copies or access to another person or entity without prior consent of a court with appropriate jurisdiction. (4)  Upon request, the child who is the subject of a youth court cause shall have the right to have his counsel inspect and copy any record, report or investigation which is filed with the youth court or which is to be considered by the youth court at a hearing. (5)  (a)  The youth court prosecutor or prosecutors, the county attorney, the district attorney, the youth court defender or defenders, or any attorney representing a child shall have the right to inspect and copy any law enforcement record involving children. (b)  The Department of Child Protection Services shall disclose to a county prosecuting attorney or district attorney any and all records resulting from an investigation into suspected child abuse or neglect when the case has been referred by the Department of Child Protection Services to the county prosecuting attorney or district attorney for criminal prosecution. (c)  Agency records made confidential under the provisions of this section may be disclosed to a court of competent jurisdiction. (d)  Records involving children shall be disclosed to the Division of Victim Compensation of the Office of the Attorney General upon the division's request without order of the youth court for purposes of determination of eligibility for victim compensation benefits. (6)  Information concerning an investigation into a report of child abuse or child neglect may be disclosed by the Department of Child Protection Services without order of the youth court to any attorney, physician, dentist, intern, resident, nurse, psychologist, social worker, family protection worker, family protection specialist, child caregiver, minister, law enforcement officer, or a public or private school employee making that report pursuant to Section 43-21-353(1) if the reporter has a continuing professional relationship with the child and a need for such information in order to protect or treat the child. (7)  Information concerning an investigation into a report of child abuse or child neglect may be disclosed without further order of the youth court to any interagency child abuse task force established in any county or municipality by order of the youth court of that county or municipality. (8)  Names and addresses of juveniles twice adjudicated as delinquent for an act which would be a felony if committed by an adult or for the unlawful possession of a firearm shall not be held confidential and shall be made available to the public. (9)  Names and addresses of juveniles adjudicated as delinquent for murder, manslaughter, burglary, arson, armed robbery, aggravated assault, any sex offense as defined in Section 45-33-23, for any violation of Section 41-29-139(a)(1) or for any violation of Section 63-11-30, shall not be held confidential and shall be made available to the public. (10)  The judges of the circuit and county courts, and presentence investigators for the circuit courts, as provided in Section 47-7-9, shall have the right to inspect any youth court records of a person convicted of a crime for sentencing purposes only. (11)  The victim of an offense committed by a child who is the subject of a youth court cause shall have the right to be informed of the child's disposition by the youth court. (12)  A classification hearing officer of the State Department of Corrections, as provided in Section 47-5-103, shall have the right to inspect any youth court records, excluding abuse and neglect records, of any offender in the custody of the department who as a child or minor was a juvenile offender or was the subject of a youth court cause of action, and the State Parole Board, as provided in Section 47-7-17, shall have the right to inspect such records when the offender becomes eligible for parole. (13)  The youth court shall notify the Department of Public Safety of the name, and any other identifying information such department may require, of any child who is adjudicated delinquent as a result of a violation of the Uniform Controlled Substances Law. (14)  The Administrative Office of Courts shall have the right to inspect any youth court records in order that the number of youthful offenders, abused, neglected, truant and dependent children, as well as children in need of special care and children in need of supervision, may be tracked with specificity through the youth court and adult justice system, and to utilize tracking forms for such purpose. (15)  Upon a request by a youth court, the Administrative Office of Courts shall disclose all information at its disposal concerning any previous youth court intakes alleging that a child was a delinquent child, child in need of supervision, child in need of special care, truant child, abused child or neglected child, as well as any previous youth court adjudications for the same and all dispositional information concerning a child who at the time of such request comes under the jurisdiction of the youth court making such request. (16)  The Administrative Office of Courts may, in its discretion, disclose to the Department of Public Safety any or all of the information involving children contained in the office's youth court data management system known as Mississippi Youth Court Information Delivery System or "MYCIDS." (17)  The youth courts of the state shall disclose to the Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review (PEER) any youth court records in order that the number of youthful offenders, abused, neglected, truant and dependent children, as well as children in need of special care and children in need of supervision, may be tracked with specificity through the youth court and adult justice system, and to utilize tracking forms for such purpose.  The disclosure prescribed in this subsection shall not require a court order and shall be made in sortable, electronic format where possible.  The PEER Committee may seek the assistance of the Administrative Office of Courts in seeking this information. The PEER Committee shall not disclose the identities of any youth who have been adjudicated in the youth courts of the state and shall only use the disclosed information for the purpose of monitoring the effectiveness and efficiency of programs established to assist adjudicated youth, and to ascertain the incidence of adjudicated youth who become adult offenders. (18)  In every case where an abuse or neglect allegation has been made, the confidentiality provisions of this section shall not apply to prohibit access to a child's records by any state regulatory agency, any state or local prosecutorial agency or law enforcement agency; however, no identifying information concerning the child in question may be released to the public by such agency except as otherwise provided herein. (19)  In every case of child abuse or neglect, if a child's physical condition is medically labeled as medically "serious" or "critical" or a child dies, the confidentiality provisions of this section shall not apply.  In such cases, the following information may be released by the Mississippi Department of Child Protection Services:  the cause of the circumstances regarding the fatality or medically serious or critical physical condition; the age and gender of the child; information describing any previous reports of child abuse or neglect investigations that are pertinent to the child abuse or neglect that led to the fatality or medically serious or critical physical condition; the result of any such investigations; and the services provided by and actions of the state on behalf of the child that are pertinent to the child abuse or neglect that led to the fatality or medically serious or critical physical condition. (20)  Any member of a foster care review board designated by the Department of Child Protection Services shall have the right to inspect youth court records relating to the abuse, neglect or child in need of supervision cases assigned to such member for review. (21)  Information concerning an investigation into a report of child abuse or child neglect may be disclosed without further order of the youth court in any administrative or due process hearing held, pursuant to Section 43-21-257, by the Department of Child Protection Services for individuals whose names will be placed on the central registry as substantiated perpetrators. (22)  The Department of Child Protection Services may disclose records involving children to the following: (a)  A foster home, residential child-caring agency or child-placing agency to the extent necessary to provide such care and services to a child; (b)  An individual, agency or organization that provides services to a child or the child's family in furtherance of the child's permanency plan to the extent necessary in providing those services; (c)  Health and mental health care providers of a child to the extent necessary for the provider to properly treat and care for the child; (d)  An educational institution or educational services provider where the child is enrolled or where enrollment is anticipated to the extent necessary for the school to provide appropriate services to the child; (e)  Any state agency or board that administers student financial assistance programs.  However, any records request under this paragraph shall be initiated by the agency or board for the purpose determining the child's eligibility for student financial assistance, and any disclosure shall be limited to the verification of the child's age during the period of time in which the child was in the department's legal custody; and (f)  Any other state agency if the disclosure is necessary to the department in fulfilling its statutory responsibilities in protecting the best interests of the child. (23)  Nothing in this section or chapter shall require youth court approval for disclosure of records involving children as defined in Section 43-21-105(u), if the disclosure is made in a criminal matter by a municipal or county prosecutor, a district attorney or statewide prosecutor, pursuant to the Mississippi Rules of Criminal Procedure and the records are disclosed under a protective order issued by the Circuit Court presiding over the criminal matter which incorporates the penalties stated in Section 43-21-267. * * *(24)  The provisions of this section shall stand repealed on July 1, 2026. SECTION 3.  Section 43-21-105, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-105.  The following words and phrases, for purposes of this chapter, shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly otherwise requires: (a)  "Youth court" means the Youth Court Division. (b)  "Judge" means the judge of the Youth Court Division. (c)  "Designee" means any person that the judge appoints to perform a duty which this chapter requires to be done by the judge or his designee.  The judge may not appoint a person who is involved in law enforcement or who is an employee of the Mississippi Department of Human Services or the Mississippi Department of Child Protection Services to be his designee. (d)  "Child" and "youth" are synonymous, and each means a person who has not reached his eighteenth birthday.  A child who has not reached his eighteenth birthday and is on active duty for a branch of the armed services or is married is not considered a "child" or "youth" for the purposes of this chapter. (e)  "Parent" means the father or mother to whom the child has been born, or the father or mother by whom the child has been legally adopted. (f)  "Guardian" means a court-appointed guardian of the person of a child. (g)  "Custodian" means any person having the present care or custody of a child whether such person be a parent or otherwise. (h)  "Legal custodian" means a court-appointed custodian of the child. (i)  "Delinquent child" means a child who has reached his tenth birthday and who has committed a delinquent act. (j)  "Delinquent act" is any act, which if committed by an adult, is designated as a crime under state or federal law, or municipal or county ordinance other than offenses punishable by life imprisonment or death.  A delinquent act includes escape from lawful detention and violations of the Uniform Controlled Substances Law and violent behavior. (k)  "Child in need of supervision" means a child who has reached his seventh birthday and is in need of treatment or rehabilitation because the child: (i)  Is habitually disobedient of reasonable and lawful commands of his parent, guardian or custodian and is ungovernable; or (ii)  While being required to attend school, willfully and habitually violates the rules thereof or willfully and habitually absents himself therefrom; or (iii)  Runs away from home without good cause; or (iv)  Has committed a delinquent act or acts. (l)  "Neglected child" means a child: (i)  Whose parent, guardian or custodian or any person responsible for his care or support, neglects or refuses, when able so to do, to provide for him proper and necessary care or support, or education as required by law, or medical, surgical, or other care necessary for his well-being; however, a parent who withholds medical treatment from any child who in good faith is under treatment by spiritual means alone through prayer in accordance with the tenets and practices of a recognized church or religious denomination by a duly accredited practitioner thereof shall not, for that reason alone, be considered to be neglectful under any provision of this chapter; or (ii)  Who is otherwise without proper care, custody, supervision or support; or (iii)  Who, for any reason, lacks the special care made necessary for him by reason of his mental condition, whether the mental condition is having mental illness or having an intellectual disability; or (iv)  Who is not provided by the child's parent, guardian or custodian, with food, clothing, or shelter necessary to sustain the life or health of the child, excluding such failure caused primarily by financial inability unless relief services have been offered and refused and the child is in imminent risk of harm. (m)  "Abused child" means a child whose parent, guardian or custodian or any person responsible for his care or support, whether legally obligated to do so or not, has caused or allowed to be caused, upon the child, sexual abuse, sexual exploitation, commercial sexual exploitation, emotional abuse, mental injury, nonaccidental physical injury or other maltreatment.  However, physical discipline, including spanking, performed on a child by a parent, guardian or custodian in a reasonable manner shall not be deemed abuse under this section.  "Abused child" also means a child who is or has been trafficked within the meaning of the Mississippi Human Trafficking Act by any person, without regard to the relationship of the person to the child. (n)  "Sexual abuse" means obscene or pornographic photographing, filming or depiction of children for commercial purposes, or the rape, molestation, incest, prostitution or other such forms of sexual exploitation of children under circumstances which indicate that the child's health or welfare is harmed or threatened. (o)  "A child in need of special care" means a child with any mental or physical illness that cannot be treated with the dispositional alternatives ordinarily available to the youth court. (p)  A "dependent child" means any child who is not a child in need of supervision, a delinquent child, an abused child or a neglected child, and which child has been voluntarily placed in the custody of the Department of Child Protection Services by his parent, guardian or custodian. (q)  "Custody" means the physical possession of the child by any person. (r)  "Legal custody" means the legal status created by a court order which gives the legal custodian the responsibilities of physical possession of the child and the duty to provide him with food, shelter, education and reasonable medical care, all subject to residual rights and responsibilities of the parent or guardian of the person. (s)  "Detention" means the care of children in physically restrictive facilities. (t)  "Shelter" means care of children in physically nonrestrictive facilities. (u)  "Records involving children" means any of the following from which the child can be identified: (i)  All youth court records as defined in Section 43-21-251; (ii)  All forensic interviews conducted by a child advocacy center in abuse and neglect investigations; (iii)  All law enforcement records as defined in Section 43-21-255; (iv)  All agency records as defined in Section 43-21-257; and (v)  All other documents maintained by any representative of the state, county, municipality or other public agency insofar as they relate to the apprehension, custody, adjudication or disposition of a child who is the subject of a youth court cause. (v)  "Any person responsible for care or support" means the person who is providing for the child at a given time.  This term shall include, but is not limited to, stepparents, foster parents, relatives, nonlicensed babysitters or other similar persons responsible for a child and staff of residential care facilities and group homes that are licensed by the Department of Human Services or the Department of Child Protection Services. (w)  The singular includes the plural, the plural the singular and the masculine the feminine when consistent with the intent of this chapter. (x)  "Out-of-home" setting means the temporary supervision or care of children by the staff of licensed day care centers, the staff of public, private and state schools, the staff of juvenile detention facilities, the staff of unlicensed residential care facilities and group homes and the staff of, or individuals representing, churches, civic or social organizations. (y)  "Durable legal custody" means the legal status created by a court order which gives the durable legal custodian the responsibilities of physical possession of the child and the duty to provide him with care, nurture, welfare, food, shelter, education and reasonable medical care.  All these duties as enumerated are subject to the residual rights and responsibilities of the natural parent(s) or guardian(s) of the child or children. (z)  "Status offense" means conduct subject to adjudication by the youth court that would not be a crime if committed by an adult. (aa)  "Financially able" means a parent or child who is ineligible for a court-appointed attorney. (bb)  "Assessment" means an individualized examination of a child to determine the child's psychosocial needs and problems, including the type and extent of any mental health, substance abuse or co-occurring mental health and substance abuse disorders and recommendations for treatment.  The term includes, but is not limited to, a drug and alcohol, psychological or psychiatric evaluation, records review, clinical interview or the administration of a formal test and instrument. (cc)  "Screening" means a process, with or without the administration of a formal instrument, that is designed to identify a child who is at increased risk of having mental health, substance abuse or co-occurring mental health and substance abuse disorders that warrant immediate attention, intervention or more comprehensive assessment. (dd)  "Durable legal relative guardianship" means the legal status created by a youth court order that conveys the physical and legal custody of a child or children by durable legal guardianship to a relative or fictive kin who is licensed as a foster or resource parent. (ee)  "Relative" means a person related to the child by affinity or consanguinity within the third degree. (ff)  "Fictive kin" means a person not related to the child legally or biologically but who is considered a relative due to a significant, familial-like and ongoing relationship with the child and family, including adults related beyond the third degree, godparents, friends of the family, or other adults who have a strong familial bond with the child. (gg)  "Reasonable efforts" means the exercise of reasonable care and due diligence by the Department of Human Services, the Department of Child Protection Services, or any other appropriate entity or person to use services appropriate to the child's background, accessible, and available to meet the individualized needs of the child and child's family to prevent removal and reunify the family as soon as safely possible consistent with the best interests of the child.  Reasonable efforts must be made in collaboration with the family and must address the individualized needs of the family that brought the child to the attention of the Department of Child Protection Services and must not consist of required services that are not related to the family's needs. (hh)  "Commercial sexual exploitation" means any sexual act or crime of a sexual nature, which is committed against a child for financial or economic gain, to obtain a thing of value for quid pro quo exchange of property or for any other purpose. SECTION 4.  Section 43-15-51, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-15-51.  (1)  The district attorneys, the Department of Human Services or the Department of Child Protection Services may initiate formal cooperative agreements with the appropriate agencies to create multidisciplinary child protection teams in order to implement a coordinated multidisciplinary team approach to intervention in reports involving alleged commercial sexual exploitation, human trafficking, or severe or potential felony child physical or sexual abuse, exploitation, or maltreatment.  The multidisciplinary team also may be known as a child abuse task force.  The purpose of the team or task force shall be to assist in the evaluation and investigation of reports and to provide consultation and coordination for agencies involved in child protection cases.  The agencies to be included as members of the multidisciplinary team are:  the district attorney's office, city and county law enforcement agencies, county attorneys, youth court prosecutors, the Human Trafficking Coordinator or his or her designee and other agencies as appropriate.  The Department of Child Protection Services shall be included as a member of the multidisciplinary team if the department does not initiate creation of the team. (2)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 43-26-3, to implement the multidisciplinary child abuse team, the team or task force must be authorized by court order from the appropriate youth court.  The court order will designate which agencies will participate in the cooperative multidisciplinary team. (3)  (a)  Teams created under this section may invite other persons to serve on the team who have knowledge of and experience in child abuse and neglect and commercial sexual exploitation and human trafficking matters.  These persons may include licensed mental and physical health practitioners and physicians, dentists, representatives of the district attorney's office and the Attorney General's office, experts in the assessment and treatment of substance abuse or sexual abuse, the victim assistance coordinator of the district attorney's office, staff members of a child advocacy center, sexual assault nurse examiners and experts in providing services to commercial sexual exploitation and human trafficking victims.  For purposes of this paragraph, the term "sexual assault nurse examiner" means a registered nurse who has received a documented forty (40) hours of training as a sexual assault nurse examiner. (b)  (i)  A child advocacy center means an agency that advocates on behalf of children alleged to have been abused and assists in the coordination of the investigation of child abuse by providing a location for forensic interviews and promoting the coordination of services for children alleged to have been abused.  A child advocacy center provides services that include, but are not limited to, forensic medical examinations, mental health and related support services, court advocacy, consultation, training for social workers, law enforcement training, and child abuse multidisciplinary teams, and staffing of multidisciplinary teams. (ii)  Child advocacy centers may provide a video-taped forensic interview of the child in a child friendly environment or separate building.  The purpose of the video-taped forensic interview is to prevent further trauma to a child in the investigation and prosecution of child physical and sexual abuse cases.  Child advocacy centers can also assist child victims by providing therapeutic counseling subsequent to the interview by a qualified therapist.  Child advocacy centers can also assist law enforcement and prosecutors by acquainting child victim witnesses and their parents or guardians to the courtroom through child court school programs. (4)  A team or task force created under this section shall review records on cases referred to the team by the Department of Child Protection Services or law enforcement or the district attorney's office.  The team shall meet at least monthly. (5)  No person shall disclose information obtained from a meeting of the multidisciplinary team unless necessary to comply with the Department of Child Protection Services regulations or conduct and proceeding in youth court or criminal court proceedings or as authorized by a court of competent jurisdiction. (6)  A child advocacy center or a member of the multidisciplinary team is not liable for civil damages while acting within the scope of official team duties if the center or member, in good faith, refers a report of alleged child abuse for investigation, conducts an investigation, makes an investigative judgment or disposition, or releases or uses information for the purpose of protecting a child.  The limitation of civil liability does not apply if a child advocacy center or multidisciplinary team member is not acting in good faith.  The limitation of liability provided by this subsection for a child advocacy center or member of the multidisciplinary team, shall only apply when the child advocacy center or the member is acting on behalf of or within the scope of duties for the multidisciplinary team as described in this section. SECTION 5.  Section 43-21-353, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 43-21-353.  (1)  Any attorney, physician, dentist, intern, resident, nurse, psychologist, social worker, family protection worker, family protection specialist, child caregiver, minister, law enforcement officer, public or private school employee or any other person having reasonable cause to suspect that a child is a neglected child, an abused child, or a victim of commercial sexual exploitation or human trafficking shall cause an oral report to be made immediately by telephone or otherwise and followed as soon thereafter as possible by a report in writing to the Department of Child Protection Services, and immediately a referral shall be made by the Department of Child Protection Services to the youth court intake unit, which unit shall promptly comply with Section 43-21-357. In the course of an investigation, at the initial time of contact with the individual(s) about whom a report has been made under this Youth Court Act or with the individual(s) responsible for the health or welfare of a child about whom a report has been made under this chapter, the Department of Child Protection Services shall inform the individual of the specific complaints or allegations made against the individual.  Consistent with subsection (4), the identity of the person who reported his or her suspicion shall not be disclosed at that point.  Where appropriate, the Department of Child Protection Services shall additionally make a referral to the youth court prosecutor. Upon receiving a report that a child has been sexually abused, is a victim of commercial sexual exploitation or human trafficking or has been burned, tortured, mutilated or otherwise physically abused in such a manner as to cause serious bodily harm, or upon receiving any report of abuse that would be a felony under state or federal law, the Department of Child Protection Services shall immediately notify the law enforcement agency in whose jurisdiction the abuse occurred.  Within forty-eight (48) hours, the department must notify the appropriate prosecutor and the Statewide Human Trafficking Coordinator.  The department shall have the duty to provide the law enforcement agency all the names and facts known at the time of the report; this duty shall be of a continuing nature.  The law enforcement agency and the department shall investigate the reported abuse immediately and shall file a preliminary report with the appropriate prosecutor's office within twenty-four (24) hours and shall make additional reports as new or additional information or evidence becomes available.  The department shall advise the clerk of the youth court and the youth court prosecutor of all cases of abuse reported to the department within seventy-two (72) hours and shall update such report as information becomes available.  In addition, if the Department of Child Protection Services determines that a parent or other person responsible for the care or welfare of an abused or neglected child maintains active duty status within the military, the department shall notify the applicable military installation family advocacy program that there is an allegation of abuse or neglect that relates to that child. (2)  Any report shall contain the names and addresses of the child and his parents or other persons responsible for his care, if known, the child's age, the nature and extent of the child's injuries, including any evidence of previous injuries, any other information that might be helpful in establishing the cause of the injury, and the identity of the perpetrator. (3)  The Department of Child Protection Services shall maintain a statewide incoming wide-area telephone service or similar service for the purpose of receiving reports of suspected cases of child abuse, commercial sexual exploitation or human trafficking; provided that any attorney, physician, dentist, intern, resident, nurse, psychologist, social worker, family protection worker, family protection specialist, child caregiver, minister, law enforcement officer or public or private school employee who is required to report under subsection (1) of this section shall report in the manner required in subsection (1). (4)  Reports of abuse, neglect and commercial sexual exploitation or human trafficking made under this chapter and the identity of the reporter are confidential except when the court in which the investigation report is filed, in its discretion, determines the testimony of the person reporting to be material to a judicial proceeding or when the identity of the reporter is released to law enforcement agencies and the appropriate prosecutor pursuant to subsection (1).  Reports made under this section to any law enforcement agency or prosecutorial officer are for the purpose of criminal investigation and prosecution only and no information from these reports may be released to the public except as provided by Section 43-21-261. Disclosure of any information by the prosecutor shall be according to the Mississippi Uniform Rules of Circuit and County Court Procedure.  The identity of the reporting party shall not be disclosed to anyone other than law enforcement officers or prosecutors without an order from the appropriate youth court.  Any person disclosing any reports made under this section in a manner not expressly provided for in this section or Section 43-21-261 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to the penalties prescribed by Section 43-21-267. Notwithstanding the confidentiality of the reporter's identity under this section, the Department of Child Protection Services may disclose a reporter's identity to the appropriate law enforcement agency or prosecutor if the department has reason to suspect the reporter has made a fraudulent report, and the Department of Child Protection Services must provide to the subject of the alleged fraudulent report written notification of the disclosure. (5)  All final dispositions of law enforcement investigations described in subsection (1) of this section shall be determined only by the appropriate prosecutor or court.  All final dispositions of investigations by the Department of Child Protection Services as described in subsection (1) of this section shall be determined only by the youth court.  Reports made under subsection (1) of this section by the Department of Child Protection Services to the law enforcement agency and to the district attorney's office shall include the following, if known to the department: (a)  The name and address of the child; (b)  The names and addresses of the parents; (c)  The name and address of the suspected perpetrator; (d)  The names and addresses of all witnesses, including the reporting party if a material witness to the abuse; (e)  A brief statement of the facts indicating that the child has been abused, including whether the child experienced commercial sexual exploitation or human trafficking, and any other information from the agency files or known to the family protection worker or family protection specialist making the investigation, including medical records or other records, which may assist law enforcement or the district attorney in investigating and/or prosecuting the case; and (f)  What, if any, action is being taken by the Department of Child Protection Services. (6)  In any investigation of a report made under this chapter of the abuse or neglect of a child as defined in Section 43-21-105(l) or (m), the Department of Child Protection Services may request the appropriate law enforcement officer with jurisdiction to accompany the department in its investigation, and in such cases the law enforcement officer shall comply with such request. (7)  Anyone who willfully violates any provision of this section shall be, upon being found guilty, punished by a fine not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or by imprisonment in jail not to exceed one (1) year, or both. (8)  If a report is made directly to the Department of Child Protection Services that a child has been abused or neglected or experienced commercial sexual exploitation or human trafficking in an out-of-home setting, a referral shall be made immediately to the law enforcement agency in whose jurisdiction the abuse occurred and the department shall notify the district attorney's office and the Statewide Human Trafficking Coordinator within forty-eight (48) hours of such report.  The Department of Child Protection Services shall investigate the out-of-home setting report of abuse or neglect to determine whether the child who is the subject of the report, or other children in the same environment, comes within the jurisdiction of the youth court and shall report to the youth court the department's findings and recommendation as to whether the child who is the subject of the report or other children in the same environment require the protection of the youth court.  The law enforcement agency shall investigate the reported abuse immediately and shall file a preliminary report with the district attorney's office within forty-eight (48) hours and shall make additional reports as new information or evidence becomes available.  If the out-of-home setting is a licensed facility, an additional referral shall be made by the Department of Child Protection Services to the licensing agency.  The licensing agency shall investigate the report and shall provide the department, the law enforcement agency and the district attorney's office with their written findings from such investigation as well as that licensing agency's recommendations and actions taken. (9)  If a child protective investigation does not result in an out-of-home placement, a child protective investigator must provide information to the parent or guardians about community service programs that provide respite care, counseling and support for children who have experienced commercial sexual exploitation or human trafficking, voluntary guardianship or other support services for families in crisis. SECTION 6.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.